Utah statutes.
58-40-602.   Recreational therapy treatment or intervention plans.

(1)  A recreational therapy treatment or intervention plan shall be maintained for each patient receiving recreational therapy services under this chapter.

(2)  The treatment or intervention plan shall include:

(a)  goals and objectives for a patient that are developed from an assessment based on the strengths and limitations of the patient's physical, cognitive, social, behavioral, emotional, spiritual, and leisure capabilities;

(b)  the selection and adaptation of interventions designed to achieve and maintain the highest possible level of functional independence and quality of life for a patient;

(c)  a schedule for regular evaluation of goals and objectives to make changes to the treatment or intervention plan when required; and

(d)  expected outcomes related to the goals and objectives.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 82, 2012 General Session

